Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 1027 (2) 91 jm/jh/md H.F. 1027 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 103A.8E Radon mitigation 1 requirements. 2 The commissioner shall adopt as part of the state building 3 code a requirement that new single-family or two-family 4 residential construction must include passive methods for the 5 mitigation of radon. The requirement shall only apply to 6 single-family or two-family residential construction commenced 7 after the adoption of the requirement. 8 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 422.10C Radon mitigation system tax 9 credit. 10 1. As used in this section, âradon mitigation systemâ means 11 a system designed to reduce radon concentrations in the indoor 12 air of a building that has been installed. 13 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits 14 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a radon 15 mitigation system tax credit equal to the amount to purchase 16 and install a radon mitigation system, not to exceed one 17 thousand dollars. 18 3. An individual may claim the tax credit allowed a 19 partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, estate, 20 or trust electing to have the income taxed directly to the 21 individual. The amount claimed by the individual shall be 22 based upon the pro rata share of the individualâs earnings of 23 the partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, 24 estate, or trust. 25 4. Any credit in excess of the taxpayerâs tax liability 26 for the tax year is not refundable but the excess for the tax 27 year may be credited to the tax liability for the following tax 28 year. 29 Sec. 3. Section 422.33, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 30 following new subsection: 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. a. The taxes imposed under this 32 subchapter shall be reduced by a radon mitigation system tax 33 credit equal to the amount to purchase and install a radon 34 mitigation system, not to exceed one thousand dollars. 35 -1- HF 1027 (2) 91 jm/jh/md 1/ 2 H.F. 1027 b. The taxpayer may claim the credit pursuant to this 1 subsection according to the same requirements, conditions, and 2 limitations as provided pursuant to section 422.10C. 3 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following apply 4 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 5 or after that date: 6 1. The section of this Act enacting section 422.10C. 7 2. The section of this Act amending section 422.33. 8 -2- HF 1027 (2) 91 jm/jh/md 2/ 2